Washington statutes.
RCW 9.35.050

Incident reports.

(1) A person who has learned or reasonably suspects that his or her financial information or means of identification has been unlawfully obtained, used by, or disclosed to another, as described in this chapter, may file an incident report with a law enforcement agency, by contacting the local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over his or her actual residence, place of business, or place where the crime occurred. The law enforcement agency shall create a police incident report of the matter and provide the complainant with a copy of that report, and may refer the incident report to another law enforcement agency.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a law enforcement agency to investigate reports claiming identity theft. An incident report filed under this section is not required to be counted as an open case for purposes of compiling open case statistics.

[ 2008 c 207 s 2.]